Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4716
Agents.

No individual may apply, procure, negotiate, or place for others any policy or contract of a prepaid limited health service organization unless that individual holds a license pursuant to the Insurance Producers Licensing Act to sell accident and health insurance policies or health maintenance organization contracts.

Laws 1989, LB 320, § 16.

Insurance Producers Licensing Act, see section 44-4047.